Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.46.070

Suits against bank or conservator, where brought—Suits by conservator.

Any suit filed against a bank or its conservator, after the entrance of an order by the director placing such bank in conservatorship and while such order is in effect, shall be brought in the superior court of Thurston county and not elsewhere. The conservator appointed hereunder for such bank may file suit in any superior court or other court of competent jurisdiction against any person for the purpose of preserving, protecting, or recovering any asset or property of such bank including claims or causes of action belonging to or which may be asserted by such bank.

[ 2014 c 37 s 250; 2013 c 76 s 19; 1994 c 92 s 139; 1975 1st ex.s. c 87 s 7. Formerly RCW 30.46.070.]